Utah statutes.
76-6-802.   Presumption of intent.

A person who willfully conceals library materials on his person or among his belongings while on the premises of the library or in its immediate vicinity is prima facie presumed to have concealed library materials with the intention of converting them to his own use.  If library materials are found concealed upon his person or among his belongings, or electronic security devices are activated by the person's presence, it is prima facie evidence of willful concealment.



Amended by Chapter 245, 1987 General Session

